en: Pouting
fr: Tacaud

en: European plaice
fr: Carrelet crue, Plie, Plie commun

en: Breaded fried European plaice
fr: Carrelet pané frit, Plie pané frit

en: Steamed European plaice
fr: Carrelet cuit à la vapeur, Plie cuit à la vapeur

en: Common dab
fr: Limande

en: Lemon sole
fr: Limande-sole

en: Breaded lemon sole, Breaded fried lemon sole
fr: Limande-sole panée, Limande-sole panée frite

en: Steamed lemon sole
fr: Limande-sole cuite à la vapeur

en: largehead hairtail
fr: Sabre

en: shark
bg: Акула
fr: Requin
hr: Morski pas
ja: 鮫, サメ

en: Ray
fr: Raie

en: Roasted ray, Baked ray
fr: Raie rôtie, Raie cuite au four

en: Ray cooked in an aromatic stock
fr: Raie cuite au court-bouillon

en: Cooked nursehound, Cooked lesser spotted dogfish
fr: Roussette cuite, Petite roussette cuite, Saumonette cuite

en: nursehound, lesser spotted dogfish
fr: Roussette, Roussette crue, Petite roussette crue, Saumonette

en: Megrim
fr: Cardine franche

en: Irish sea products
fr: Produits de la mer irlandais

en: Scallops coral
fr: Corail de coquilles Saint-Jacques

en: Scallops with coral
fr: Coquilles Saint-Jacques avec noix et corail

en: Frozen scallops with coral
fr: Coquilles Saint-Jacques surgelées, Coquilles St-Jacques surgelées